Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1706
Purchaser, defined.

Purchaser shall mean a person who is solicited to become obligated or does become obligated on a seller-assisted marketing plan contract.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 6.